District of Columbia statutes.
36-152

Filing and publication of vessel description.

Persons engaged in producing, manufacturing, bottling, or selling any lawful beverages composed principally of milk, in vessels with their name, trademark, or other distinctive mark, and the word “registered” branded, engraved, blown, or otherwise produced thereon, or on which a pasted trademark label is put upon which the word “registered” is also distinctly printed, may file with the Recorder of Deeds of the District of Columbia a description by facsimile, or a sample of an original package so marked or branded or blown, showing plainly such names and marks thereon, together with their name in full, or their corporate name, and also their place of business in the District of Columbia, and if so filed shall cause the same to be published for not less than 2 weeks successively in a daily or weekly newspaper published in the District of Columbia.

History

Mar. 3, 1901, ch. 854, § 878b
Feb. 27, 1907, 34 Stat. 1006, ch. 2086
June 25, 1936, 49 Stat. 1921, ch. 804
July 5, 1966, 80 Stat. 263, Pub. L. 89-493, § 6

Cross References

Deceptive imitation of goods, criminal penalty, see § 22-1502.
Labeling of milk containers, see § 37-201.14.
Milk, cream, and ice cream, see § 48-601 et seq.
Registration of milk containers, see § 36-121 et seq.

Section References

This section is referenced in § 36-151, § 36-153, and § 36-155.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 48-302.
1973 Ed., § 48-302.